Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-530
Presumption of compliance.

Any instrument executed by a contracting public body and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest in any property under the Nebraska Redevelopment Act shall be conclusive evidence of compliance with the provisions of the act insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or other transferees of such property is concerned.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 30.